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DTC C 1231 / 31 SteeringAngleSensorCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1231 / 31

Detection of any of conditions 1. through 3.:
1. When the condition that ECU terminal IG1 voltage is 9.5

V or more, and does not receive a data from steering
angle sensor continues for 1 sec. or more.

2.When thesteeringanglesensorvaluechangesby360 ˚
ormorewithSSCsignal fromsteeringanglesensor
remaining ON or OFF.

3. When the condition that difference between the steering
angle value at edge occurring in SSC signal and the
value at edge occurring in SSC signal after turning the
steeringwheelone −turn isoutof the renge from355.5 ˚
− 364.5˚ occurs10 timesormore.

SSteeringanglesensor
SSteeringanglesensorcircuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the steering angle sensor circuit, the ECU prohibits TRC & VSC controls.

WIRING DIAGRAM

DI6XF−01
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Start the inspection fromstep1 incaseofusing thehand −held testerandstart fromstep2 incaseofnot
using thehand −held tester.

1 Checkoutputvalueof thesteeringanglesensor.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check that the steering wheel turning angle value of the steering angle position sensor displayed on the
hand−held tester ischangingwhen turning thesteeringwheel.
OK:

Steering wheel turning angle value must be changing.

OK Go to step 5.

NG

2 Replace the ECU and check whether or not the trouble occurs again.

OK Replace steering angle sensor.

NG

END
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3 Check steering angle sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the steering wheel lower No. 2 and No. 3 covers,

steering wheel pad, steering wheel column upper and
lowercovers (SeePub.No.RM616EonpageSR −13or
SR−29).

(b) Disconnect the combination switch connector (for steer-
ing angle sensor).

(c) Connect the oscilloscope to the terminals 3 and 6 of the
combinationswitchconnector (forsteeringanglesensor).

(d) Apply battery voltage between terminals 1 and 2.
CHECK:
Turns the steering wheel slowly and check the signal waveform.
OK:

HINT:
The above signal waveform does not repeat ON and OFF regu-
larly and this combination changes case by case according to
the data.

NG Replace steering angle sensor.

OK

4 Check that slits of the steering sensor disc are clogged up.

NG Repair or replace steering sensor disc.

OK
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5 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between steering
position sensor and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.


